Indiana, session 2026, HB1224.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. "Adverse event", for purposes of IC 16-38-7.5,
has the meaning set forth in IC 16-38-7.5-1.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-54.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 54.6. "Childhood vaccine", for
purposes of IC 16-38-7.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-38-7.5-2.
SECTION 3. IC 16-18-2-163, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.179-2022(ss), SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 163. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (c), "health care provider", for purposes of
IC 16-21, IC 16-38-7.5, and IC 16-41, means any of the following:
(1) An individual, a partnership, a corporation, a professional
corporation, a facility, or an institution licensed or legally
authorized by this state to provide health care or professional
2026 IN 1224—LS 6936/DI 92


services as a licensed physician, a psychiatric hospital, a hospital,
a health facility, an emergency ambulance service (IC 16-31-3),
a dentist, a registered or licensed practical nurse, a midwife, an
optometrist, a pharmacist, a podiatrist, a chiropractor, a physical
therapist, a respiratory care practitioner, an occupational therapist,
a psychologist, a paramedic, an emergency medical technician, an
advanced emergency medical technician, an athletic trainer, or a
person who is an officer, employee, or agent of the individual,
partnership, corporation, professional corporation, facility, or
institution acting in the course and scope of the person's
employment.
(2) A college, university, or junior college that provides health
care to a student, a faculty member, or an employee, and the
governing board or a person who is an officer, employee, or agent
of the college, university, or junior college acting in the course
and scope of the person's employment.
(3) A blood bank, community mental health center, community
intellectual disability center, community health center, or migrant
health center.
(4) A home health agency (as defined in IC 16-27-1-2).
(5) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
(6) A health care organization whose members, shareholders, or
partners are health care providers under subdivision (1).
(7) A corporation, partnership, or professional corporation not
otherwise qualified under this subsection that:
(A) provides health care as one (1) of the corporation's,
partnership's, or professional corporation's functions;
(B) is organized or registered under state law; and
(C) is determined to be eligible for coverage as a health care
provider under IC 34-18 for the corporation's, partnership's, or
professional corporation's health care function.
Coverage for a health care provider qualified under this subdivision is
limited to the health care provider's health care functions and does not
extend to other causes of action.
(b) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-35, has the
meaning set forth in subsection (a). However, for purposes of IC 16-35,
the term also includes a health facility (as defined in section 167 of this
chapter).
(c) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-32-5, IC 16-36-5,
IC 16-36-6, and IC 16-41-10 means an individual licensed or
authorized by this state to provide health care or professional services
2026 IN 1224—LS 6936/DI 92


as:
(1) a licensed physician;
(2) a registered nurse;
(3) a licensed practical nurse;
(4) an advanced practice registered nurse;
(5) a certified nurse midwife;
(6) a paramedic;
(7) an emergency medical technician;
(8) an advanced emergency medical technician;
(9) an emergency medical responder, as defined by section 109.8
of this chapter;
(10) a licensed dentist;
(11) a home health aide, as defined by section 174 of this chapter;
or
(12) a licensed physician assistant.
The term includes an individual who is an employee or agent of a
health care provider acting in the course and scope of the individual's
employment.
(d) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-36-7, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-36-7-12.
(e) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-40-4, means any
of the following:
(1) An individual, a partnership, a corporation, a professional
corporation, a facility, or an institution licensed or authorized by
the state to provide health care or professional services as a
licensed physician, a psychiatric hospital, a hospital, a health
facility, an emergency ambulance service (IC 16-31-3), an
ambulatory outpatient surgical center, a dentist, an optometrist, a
pharmacist, a podiatrist, a chiropractor, a psychologist, or a
person who is an officer, employee, or agent of the individual,
partnership, corporation, professional corporation, facility, or
institution acting in the course and scope of the person's
employment.
(2) A blood bank, laboratory, community mental health center,
community intellectual disability center, community health
center, or migrant health center.
(3) A home health agency (as defined in IC 16-27-1-2).
(4) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
(5) A health care organization whose members, shareholders, or
partners are health care providers under subdivision (1).
(6) A corporation, partnership, or professional corporation not
2026 IN 1224—LS 6936/DI 92


otherwise specified in this subsection that:
(A) provides health care as one (1) of the corporation's,
partnership's, or professional corporation's functions;
(B) is organized or registered under state law; and
(C) is determined to be eligible for coverage as a health care
provider under IC 34-18 for the corporation's, partnership's, or
professional corporation's health care function.
(7) A person that is designated to maintain the records of a person
described in subdivisions (1) through (6).
(f) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-45-4, has the
meaning set forth in 47 CFR 54.601(a).
SECTION 4. IC 16-18-2-194.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 194.9. "IVAERS", for purposes
of IC 16-38-7.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-38-7.5-3.
SECTION 5. IC 16-38-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 7.5. Indiana Vaccination Adverse Event Reporting
System
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "adverse event" means any of the
following occurring after the administration of a childhood
vaccine:
(1) An event that is a reportable event for purposes of the
administration of the federal vaccination adverse event
reporting system as published by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services in the Table of
Reportable Events in effect on January 1, 2022.
(2) A diagnosis that a child receiving the childhood vaccine
has autism spectrum disorder.
(3) Any other reaction or injury that a health care provider
determines is proximately caused by the administration of the
childhood vaccine.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "childhood vaccine" means an
immunization described in IC 20-34-4-2(a).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "IVAERS" refers to the Indiana
vaccination adverse event reporting system established under
section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. The state department shall develop the Indiana
vaccination adverse event reporting system. IVAERS must enable
a health care provider to report the occurrence of an adverse event
experienced by a child residing in Indiana who is under the care of
2026 IN 1224—LS 6936/DI 92


the health care provider.
Sec. 5. A health care provider shall, in the form and manner
required by the rules adopted by the state department, report to
the state department through IVAERS the occurrence of an
adverse event experienced by a child residing in Indiana who is
under the care of the health care provider.
Sec. 6. The state department shall do the following:
(1) Create a searchable Internet data base for publishing
information reported through IVAERS under section 5 of this
chapter after removing any personal identifying information
of a child who experiences an adverse event.
(2) Provide continuing twenty-four (24) hour a day online
access to the data base.
(3) Secure the information collected under section 5 of this
chapter and the data base maintained under this chapter
against access by unauthorized persons.
Sec. 7. (a) Health information reported by a health care
provider through IVAERS is confidential.
(b) The state department may release information received
through IVAERS relating to a particular individual to the
individual or to the individual's parent or guardian if the
individual is less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(c) With the consent of the individual or of the individual's
parent or guardian if the individual is less than eighteen (18) years
of age, the state department may release information received
through IVAERS relating to a particular individual to a health
care provider.
(d) A person who knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly
discloses confidential information received through IVAERS in
violation of this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 8. The state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to implement this chapter, including rules concerning the
following:
(1) The form and manner in which a health care provider
must submit information to IVAERS.
(2) Protecting the privacy and personal identifying
information of children who experience adverse events.
(3) The form and manner of publishing information relating
to adverse events without breaching the confidentiality of the
health information of particular individuals.
(4) The design of the data base required under section 6 of this
chapter.
2026 IN 1224—LS 6936/DI 92


Sec. 9. Money is annually appropriated to the state department
from the state general fund in an amount sufficient to establish and
maintain IVAERS established under section 4 of this chapter.
SECTION 6. IC 35-52-16-33.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 33.5. IC 16-38-7.5-7 defines a
crime concerning the release of confidential information
maintained in the Indiana vaccination adverse event reporting
system.
2026 IN 1224—LS 6936/DI 92